Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1054.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1554(a)(1), (b), (c), (d)(1), (e), (f)(1) introductory paragraph and (2) and (g) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are amended to read:Section 1554. Holocaust, Genocide and Human Rights Violations Instruction.--(a) (1) Beginning with school year [2015-2016] 2027-2028, each school entity [may] shall offer instruction in the Holocaust, genocide and human rights violations to students. The instruction shall be integrated within the social studies and language arts courses of study 12345678910111213141516171819 required in accordance with State Board of Education regulations. Instruction may also be integrated into other appropriate courses of study.* * *(b) (1) The Department of Education shall establish curriculum guidelines no later than twelve (12) months after the effective date of this section. The Department of Education shall update the guidelines no later than the beginning of the 2027-2028 school year. The guidelines shall encourage the inclusion of all of the following subjects where appropriate in the instruction:(i) The breadth of the history of the Holocaust, including the Third Reich dictatorship, concentration camp system, persecution of Jews and non-Jews, Jewish and non-Jewish resistance and post-World War II trials.(ii) The definition, history, response and actions taken in the face of genocide, including the Holocaust and any other genocide perpetrated against humanity, including the Rwandan genocide and other genocides committed in Australia, North America, South America, Africa, Asia and Europe.(iii) Human rights violations.(iv) Anti-Semitism, racism, indigenous tribes and slavery, the Jim Crow era in the United States, different forms of apartheid government and the abridgment of civil rights.(2) The Department of Education shall work in consultation with organizations and individuals that provide educational expertise and resources related to the Holocaust, genocide and human rights violations to develop the curriculum guidelines. [The guidelines shall state the minimum amount of instruction necessary to adequately educate students on the Holocaust, 20250HB1054PN1145 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 genocide and human rights violations.](c) Beginning with the [2015-2016] 2027-2028 school year, the Department of Education shall make available, to all school entities, in-service training programs based upon the instruction provided for under subsection (a) and the curriculum guidelines established [pursuant to] and updated under subsection (b).(d) (1) Beginning with the [2015-2016] 2027-2028 school year, each school entity providing instruction under subsection (a) shall provide, as part of its in-service training, programs on the Holocaust, genocide and human rights violations for all instructors whose teaching responsibilities include courses of study in which instruction concerning the Holocaust, genocide and human rights violations is integrated. A school entity may utilize the programs made available by the Department of Education or use other alternative programs that are consistent with the provisions of this section.* * *[(e) The Department of Education shall provide the guidelines, in-service training and any other materials developed in accordance with this section to any nonpublic school within this Commonwealth upon receiving a request from the nonpublic school.](f) The State Board of Education shall:(1) Conduct a study regarding the manner in which instruction in the Holocaust, genocide and human rights violations is offered by school entities in this Commonwealth. In conducting the study, the State Board of Education shall request that each school entity provide the State Board of Education with information concerning whether the school entity 20250HB1054PN1145 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 offers such instruction and the manner in which such instruction is offered. Each school entity shall provide information to the State Board of Education in response to a request under this paragraph. Following the 2016-2017 and 2028-2029 school [year] years, but not later than November 30, 2017, and November 30, 2029, the State Board of Education shall issue a report to the Governor, the Secretary of Education, the Chairman and Minority Chairman of the Education Committee of the Senate and the Chairman and Minority Chairman of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives addressing the following:* * *(2) Adopt a regulation, pursuant to the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the "Regulatory Review Act," to require school entities to offer instruction in the Holocaust, genocide and human rights violations that is consistent with subsections (a) and (b)[, if the study conducted by the State Board of Education under paragraph (1) demonstrates that less than ninety percent of the school entities are offering instruction in the Holocaust, genocide and human rights violations consistent with subsections (a) and (b)].* * *(g) [For purposes of this section, the term "school entity" shall mean a school district, charter school, regional charter school, cyber charter school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school.] As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Human rights violations." The term includes torture or cruel, inhuman or degrading treatment or punishment, prolonged detention without charges and trial, causing disappearance of 20250HB1054PN1145 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 persons by the abduction and clandestine detention of those persons and other flagrant denial of the right to life, liberty or the security of person."Nonpublic school." As defined in section 922.1-A(b)."School entity." A school district, charter school, regional charter school, cyber charter school, intermediate unit, area career and technical school or nonpublic school.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1054PN1145 - 5 - 12345678